Georgia, session 2025_26, HB916.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Article 2 of Chapter 5 of Title 15 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to the
Judicial Council, is amended by adding a new Code section to read as follows:
"15-5-27.
Subject to appropriations by the General Assembly or other available funding, the Judicial
Council shall provide grants to counties and municipalities for the purpose of providing
civil legal services to low-income individuals. The council shall be authorized to establish
eligibility criteria and shall consult with advocacy groups and indigent legal services
experts in establishing such criteria and standards. The council shall be authorized to
establish the grant amount awarded to each recipient on a case-by-case basis."
H. B. 916
- 1 -

LC 59 0180
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 916
- 2 -